Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-516
Contract changes authorized.

A design-build contract, a progressive design-build contract, and a construction manager-general contractor contract may be conditioned upon later refinements in scope and price and may permit the department in agreement with the design-builder, progressive design-builder, or construction manager to make changes in the project without invalidating the contract.

Laws 2023, LB565, § 16.